Hawaii, session 2026, HB1882.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending subsection (b) to read: "(b)  All other vehicles, including [motorcycles,] mopeds, trailers, semitrailers, and pole trailers having a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less, and antique motor vehicles as defined in section 249-1, except those in subsections (c) and (d), shall be certified as provided in subsection (e) every twelve months; provided that any vehicle to which this subsection applies, except a moped, shall not require inspection within two years of the date on which the vehicle was first sold." 2.  By amending subsection (h) to read: "(h)  This section shall not apply to: (1)  Any motor vehicle that is covered by part XI, governing safety of motor carrier vehicle operation and equipment; provided that the rules adopted pursuant to part IA impose standards of inspection at least as strict as those imposed under subsection (g) and that certification is required at least as often as provided in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d); (2)  Aircraft servicing vehicles that are being used exclusively on lands set aside to the department of transportation for airport purposes; [and] (3)  Motorcycles and passenger cars; and [(3)] (4)  Tractor trucks, forklifts, and top picks being used as marine terminal equipment temporarily moving in or between terminals at: (A)  Sand Island and along Sand Island Parkway and Sand Island Access Road; (B)  Kalanianaole Avenue between Kuhio Street and Kahanu Street, abutting Hilo Harbor; (C)  Kawaihae-Mahukona Road abutting Kawaihae Harbor; (D)  East Kaahumanu Avenue between Hobron Avenue and Kane Street, abutting Kahului Harbor; and (E)  Waipaa Road abutting Nawiliwili Harbor." SECTION 2.  Section 291-36, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending subsection (a) to read: "(a)  The director of transportation, in the case of state highways, or the county engineer, in the case of county roads and streets, may, upon application in writing, issue a written permit authorizing the applicant to operate or move a vehicle or combination of vehicles, self-propelled construction or farm equipment, marine terminal equipment as referenced in section [286-26(h)(3),] 286-26(h)(4), or special mobile equipment of dimensions or weights, including loads or both, which exceed the limits set in sections 291-34 and 291-35." 2.  By amending subsection (c) to read: "(c)  The application for any such permit shall specifically describe the vehicle or combination of vehicles, the self-propelled construction or farm equipment, the marine terminal equipment as referenced in section [286-26(h)(3),] 286-26(h)(4), the load to be operated or moved, the particular highways over which the permit to operate is requested, and whether such permit is requested for a single trip or for continuous operation." 3.  By amending subsections (e) and (f) to read: "(e)  Every such permit shall be carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles, self-propelled construction or farm equipment, or marine terminal equipment as referenced in section [286-26(h)(3),] 286-26(h)(4), to which it refers and shall be open to inspection of any peace officer or traffic officer or employee charged with the care or protection of the highways; provided that in the case of annual permits, this requirement may be met where a copy of the permit is carried in the vehicle, and the original permit is readily available for inspection from the operator's offices in the county of issuance. (f)  The owner of any vehicle or combination of vehicles, self-propelled construction or farm equipment, or marine terminal equipment as referenced in section [286-26(h)(3)] 286-26(h)(4) found operating in violation of the terms or conditions of any permit or over sections of the highway not covered by the permit shall be subject to the penalties provided in section 291-37." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000; provided that sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall take effect one year after the effective date of this Act.